de: Drahtstärke: Fein; Medium; Dick; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Espessura do fio: Ralo; Médio; Encorpado; Outro
it: Spessore del filo: Fine; Medio; Spesso; Altro
sk-SK: Hrúbka drôtu: Jemný; Stredný; Hustý; Iné
pt-PT: Espessura do fio: Fina; Médio; Espesso; Outro
nb: Ledningstykkelse: Tynn; Middels; Tykk; Annet
ko: 와이어 두께: 파인; 매체; 띡; 기타
fi: Metallilangan paksuus: Ohut; Keskimääräinen; Paksu; Muu
pl: Grubość przewodu: Dobre; Środek; Gruby; Inne
zh-CN: 线材粗细: 细; 媒介; 粗; 其他
th: ความหนาของลวด: บาง; สื่อ; หนา; อื่นๆ
sv: Trådtjocklek: Fint; Medium; Tjockt; Övrigt
hu: Huzal vastagsága: Finom; Közepes; Vastag; Egyéb
nl: Draaddikte: Fijn; Medium; Dik; Andere
en: Wire thickness: Fine; Medium; Thick; Other
ru: Толщина проволоки: Тонкий; Средний; Толстый; Другой
da: Trådtykkelse: Fin; Medium; Tyk; Andet
sl-SI: Debelina žice: Fino; Srednja; Debela; Drugo
es: Espesor del hilo: Fino; Medio; Grueso; Otros
ro-RO: Grosimea firului: Fin; Medie; Gros; Altele
hr-HR: Debljina žice: Tanka; Srednja; Debela; Ostalo
fr: Épaisseur du fil: Fin; Moyen; Épais; Autre
lt-LT: Virvės storis: Ploni; Vidutinis; Klampus; Kita
vi: Độ dày của dây: Mảnh; Vừa; Dày; Khác
tr: Tel Kalınlığı: İnce; Orta; Kalın; Diğer
zh-TW: 線材粗細: 細; 媒介; 厚; 其他
cs: Tloušťka drátu: Jemný; Médium; Silnější; Jiné
ja: ワイヤーの太さ: ファイン; 媒体; 厚みのある; その他
bg-BG: Дебелина на проводник: Фина; Средна; Дебела; Други
el: Πάχος σύρματος: Λεπτές; Μέση; Παχύ; Άλλο